Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5487.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-38 of the General Laws entitled "Offenses Pertaining to Schools
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following section:
16-38-15. Legacy admissions.
(a) No public or private university shall extend preferential treatment to an applicant in any
manner because of the student's familial relationship to a previous attendee during admissions
consideration.
(b) No public or private university shall inquire about a prospective student's familial
relationship to a previous attendee on an application for admission. If the university learns about
the prospective student's familial relationship to a previous attendee during the application process,
the institution shall not extend preferential treatment to the prospective student.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000159
========